Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Chapter 50. Actions for Injuries to Property Interests.

Sec. 34.50.010.
Action for injury to the inheritance.

A person seized of an estate in remainder or reversion may maintain a civil action for an injury done to the inheritance, notwithstanding an intervening estate for life or years.

History.

(§ 22-1-5 ACLA 1949)

Collateral references. —

51 Am. Jur. 2d, Life Tenants and Remaindermen, §§ 3,
4,
25,
112-115.

31 C.J.S., Estates, §§ 83, 105, 109.

Sec. 34.50.020.
Renumbered as AS 09.65.255.